Arkansas, session 2025, HB1533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 28, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 7 — Decentralized Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act

4-28-701. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Decentralized
Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act”.

4-28-702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Administrator” means a member of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association authorized by vote of the membership to
fulfill administrative or operational tasks;
(2) “Decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association” means
an unincorporated nonprofit association:
(A) Consisting of at least one hundred (100) members
joined by mutual consent under an agreement which may be in writing or
*ANS273*
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
implied from conduct, for a common nonprofit purpose;
(B) That has elected to be organized under this
subchapter; and
(C) That is not formed under any other statute that
governs its organization and operation;
(3)(A) “Digital asset” means a representation of economic,
proprietary, or access rights stored in a computer readable format.
(B) “Digital asset” does not include any underlying asset
unless the asset itself is an electronic record;
(4) “Distributed ledger technology” means a software protocol
that:
(A) Governs the rules, operations, and communications
between intersection and connection points in a telecommunications network
and its supporting infrastructure;
(B) Includes the computer software, hardware, or
collection of computer software and hardware, which use or enable distributed
ledger technologies, including blockchain; and
(C) Uses a distributed, shared, and replicated ledger,
which may:
(i) Be public or private;
(ii) Be permissioned or permissionless; or
(iii) Include the use of a digital asset as a medium
of electronic exchange;
(5) “Distribution” means the payment of a dividend or any part
of the income or profit of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association to its members or administrators;
(6) “Established practices” means the practices used by a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association without material change
during the most recent five (5) years of its existence, or if it has existed
for less than five (5) years, during its entire existence;
(7)(A) “Governing principles” means all agreements, including
without limitation articles of association, consensus formation algorithms,
or enacted governance proposals, whether in a record, implied from its
established practices, or in any combination thereof, that govern the purpose
or operation of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association and the
rights and obligations of its members and administrators.
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
(B) “Governing principles” includes any amendment or
restatement of the agreements constituting the governing principles of a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association;
(8) “Member” means a person that, under the governing principles
of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, may participate in
the development of the policies and activities of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association or the selection of administrators;
(9) “Membership interest” means a member’s voting right in a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association as determined by the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association’s governing principles;
(10) “Person” means a natural person, a partnership, whether
general or limited, a limited liability company, a trust, including without
limitation a common-law trust, business trust, statutory trust, voting trust,
or any other form of trust, an estate, an association, including without
limitation any group, organization, cotenancy, plan, board, council or
committee, a corporation, a government, including without limitation a
country, state, county, or any other governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, a custodian, a nominee, or any other individual or entity,
or series thereof, in its own capacity or any representative capacity, in
each case, whether domestic or foreign;
(11) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable
in a perceivable form;
(12) “Smart contract” means a computational process that
executes on distributed ledger technology used to automate transactions,
including without limitation:
(A) Facilitating or instructing transfers of assets;
(B) Creating and transmitting digital assets;
(C) Synchronizing information;
(D) Authenticating user rights and conveying access to
software applications; or
(E) Effectuating membership votes within an organization;
and
(13) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or
insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533

4-28-703. Relation to other law.
(a) Principles of law and equity supplement this subchapter unless
displaced by a particular provision of the subchapter.
(b) This subchapter does not repeal or modify a statute or rule for
organizations that do not elect to become decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit associations.

4-28-704. Governing law.
(a) The law of this state governs any decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association that is formed in this state.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's governing
principles shall identify the jurisdiction in which the association is
formed.

4-28-705. Legal entity — Perpetual existence — Powers.
A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association:
(1) Is a legal entity distinct from its members and
administrators;
(2) Has perpetual duration unless its governing principles
otherwise specify; and
(3)(A) May engage in profit-making activities.
(B) Any profits under subdivision (3)(A) of this section
shall be used in furtherance of, or set aside for, the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association’s common nonprofit purpose.

4-28-706. Distributions prohibited — Compensation and other permitted
payments.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association shall not pay dividends or
distribute any part of its income or profits to its members or
administrators.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may:
(1) Pay reasonable compensation or reimburse reasonable expenses
to its members, administrators, and persons outside the organization for
services rendered, including with respect to the administration and operation
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, which may include
without limitation the provision of collateral for the self-insurance of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, voting and participation;
(2) Confer benefits on its members or administrators in
conformity with its common nonprofit purpose or purposes;
(3) Repurchase membership interests to the extent authorized by
its governing principles; and
(4) Make distributions of property to members upon winding up
and termination to the extent permitted by § 4-28-728.

4-28-707. Ownership and transfer of property.
(a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association in its own
name may acquire, hold, encumber, or transfer an estate or interest in real
or personal property.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may be a
beneficiary of a trust or contract, a legatee, or a devisee.

4-28-708. Statement of authority as to real property — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “statement of authority” means a
statement authorizing a person to transfer an interest in real property held
in the name of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
(b) An interest in real property held in the name of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association may be transferred by a person
authorized to do so in a statement of authority recorded by the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association in the office in the county in which a
transfer of the property would be recorded.
(c) A statement of authority shall state:
(1) The name of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association;
(2) The address in this state, including the street address, if
any, of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or, if the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association does not have an address
in this state, its out-of-state address;
(3) That the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
is a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association; and
(4) The action, procedure or vote of the decentralized
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
unincorporated nonprofit association that authorizes the person to transfer
the real property of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
and that authorizes the person to execute the statement of authority.
(d) A statement of authority shall be executed in the same manner as
an affidavit by a person who is not the person authorized to transfer the
estate or interest.
(e) A filing officer may collect a fee for recording a statement of
authority in the amount authorized for recording a transfer of real property.
(f) A record amending, revoking, or canceling a statement of authority
or stating that the statement is unauthorized for recording an original
statement may be filed.
(g) Unless canceled earlier, a recorded statement of authority and its
most recent amendment shall expire five (5) years after the date of the most
recent recording.
(h) If the record title to real property is in the name of a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association and the statement of
authority is recorded in the office of the county in which a transfer of real
property would be recorded, the authority of the person named in a statement
of authority under subdivision (c)(4) of this section is conclusive in favor
of a person who gives value without notice that the person lacks authority.

4-28-709. Liability.
(a)(1) A debt, obligation, or other liability of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association is solely the debt, obligation, or other
liability of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
(2) A member or administrator is not personally liable, directly
or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise for a debt, obligation, or
other liability of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
solely by reason of being or acting as a member or administrator.
(3) Subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this subsubsection apply
regardless of the dissolution of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association.
(b) A person’s status as a member or administrator does not prevent or
restrict law other than this subchapter from imposing liability on the person
or the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association because of the
person’s conduct.
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
(c) The failure of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or
administration of its activities and affairs is not grounds for imposing
liability on a member or administrator of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.

4-28-710. Assertion and defense of claims.
(a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, in its own
name, may institute, defend, intervene, or participate in a judicial,
administrative, or other governmental proceeding or in an arbitration,
mediation, or any other form of alternative dispute resolution.
(b)(1) A member or administrator may assert a claim the member or
administrator has against the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association.
(2) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may
assert a claim it has against a member or administrator.

4-28-711. Effect of judgment or order.
A judgment or order against a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association is not by itself a judgment or order against a member or
administrator.

4-28-712. Appointment of agent to receive service of process.
(a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may file in
the office of the Secretary of State a statement appointing an agent
authorized to receive service of process.
(b) A statement appointing an agent shall set forth:
(1) The name of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association; and
(2) The name of the person in this state authorized to receive
service of process and the person’s address, including the street address, in
this state.
(c)(1) A statement appointing an agent shall be signed and
acknowledged by a person authorized by the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association.
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
(2) The statement required under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be signed and acknowledged by the person appointed agent, who
thereby accepts the appointment.
(3) The appointed agent may resign by filing a resignation in
the office of the Secretary of State and giving notice to the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association.
(d) The Secretary of State may collect a fee for filing a statement
appointing an agent to receive service of process, an amendment, or a
resignation in the amount charged for filing similar documents.
(e) An amendment to or cancellation of a statement appointing an agent
to receive service of process shall meet the requirements for execution of an
original statement.
(f) An amendment shall be filed to update the office of the Secretary
of State as to any change regarding an agent authorized to receive service of
process within thirty (30) days of a change being made.

4-28-713. Service of process.
In an action or proceeding against a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association, a summons and complaint or other process shall be
served on an agent authorized by appointment to receive service of process,
any appointed administrator of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association, or in any other manner authorized by the law of this state.

4-28-714. Claim not abated by change of members or other persons.
A claim for relief against a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association does not abate because of a change in its members or persons
authorized to administer the affairs of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association.

4-28-715. Venue.
In addition to any other applicable state laws providing venue, venue
of an action against a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may
be brought in this state in the county in which the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association has appointed an agent for services
under § 4-28-712.

03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
4-28-716. Member has no agency power.
A member of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association is not
an agent of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association solely by
reason of being a member.

4-28-717. Member approval.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in the governing principles, a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the approval of
its members according to its governing principles to:
(1) Suspend, dismiss, or expel a member;
(2) Select or dismiss an administrator;
(3) Adopt, amend, or repeal the governing principles;
(4) Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or
substantially all, of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association’s property, with or without the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association’s goodwill, outside the ordinary course of its
activities;
(5) Dissolve under § 4-28-727, merge under § 4-28-729, or
convert under § 4-28-730;
(6) Undertake any other act outside the ordinary course of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association’s activities; or
(7) Determine the policy and purposes of the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association shall have
the approval of the members according to its governing principles to do any
other acts or exercise a right that the governing principles require to be
approved by members.
(c) Unless otherwise provided for in the governing principles,
membership interest in a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
shall be calculated in proportion to members' voting rights within the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.

4-28-718. Utilization of distributed ledger technology.
(a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may provide
for its governance, in whole or in part, through distributed ledger
technology, including smart contracts.
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
(b) The governing principles for a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association may:
(1) Specify whether any distributed ledger technology utilized
or enabled by the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association shall be
fully immutable or subject to change and whether any such ledger shall be
fully or partially public or private, including the extent of members’ access
to information; and
(2) Adopt voting procedures, which may include smart contracts
deployed to distributed ledger technology that provide for the following:
(A) Proposals from administrators or members in the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association for upgrades,
modifications or additions to software systems or protocols;
(B) Other proposed changes to the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association’s governing principles; and
(C) Any other matters of governance or activities within
the purpose of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.

4-28-719. Consensus formation algorithms and governance process.
According to its governing principles, a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association may:
(1) Adopt any reasonable algorithm for establishing consensus
for the validation of records, as well as for establishing requirements,
processes, and procedures for conducting operations, or making organizational
decisions with respect to the distributed ledger technology used by the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association; and
(2) According to any procedure specified under § 4-28-718,
modify the consensus mechanism as well as the requirements, processes, and
procedures, or substitute a new consensus mechanism, requirement, processes,
or procedures that comply with the requirements of law and the governing
principles of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.

4-28-720. Duties to members.
(a) A member does not have any fiduciary duty to a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association or to any other member of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association solely by being a member.
(b) A member shall discharge the duties and obligations under this
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
subchapter or under the governing principles and exercise any rights
consistent with the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

4-28-721. Admission, suspension, dismissal, or expulsion of members.
(a)(1) A person becomes a member according to the governing principles
of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
(2) If there are no applicable governing principles, a person
shall:
(A) Be considered a member upon such person’s purchase or
assumption of a right of ownership of a membership interest or other property
or instruments that confers upon a person a voting right within the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association; and
(B) Continue as a member until the earlier of the person’s
resignation under § 4-28-722 or expulsion under subsection (b) of this
section.
(b)(1) A member may be suspended or expelled according to the
governing principles of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association.
(2) If there are no applicable governing principles, a person
may be suspended or expelled from a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association only by a vote of its members.
(c) Unless the governing principles provide otherwise, the suspension
or expulsion of a member does not relieve the member from any obligation
incurred or commitment made by the member before suspension or expulsion.

4-28-722. Member’s resignation.
(a)(1) A member may resign as a member of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association according to the governing principles.
(2) In the absence of applicable governing principles, a member
shall be deemed to have resigned as a member upon the disposal, voluntary or
involuntary, of all membership interest or other property or instruments that
confers upon the person a voting right within the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association.
(b) Unless a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association’s
governing principles provide otherwise, resignation of a member does not
relieve the member from any unpaid capital contribution, dues, assessments,
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
fees, or other obligation incurred or commitment made by the member before
resignation.

4-28-723. Membership interest transferable.
Except as otherwise provided in the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association’s governing principles, a member’s interest or any
right thereunder is freely transferable to another person through conveyance
of membership interest.

4-28-724. Selection of administrators — Rights and duties of
administrators.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter or a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association’s governing principles, the members may
select the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association’s
administrators according to § 4-28-717.
(b) If an administrator is not selected, then no member of the
association is an administrator.
(c) As there is no requirement that a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association should have administrators, there are no default
obligations, and the rights and duties of an administrator or administrators
are a result of the specific authority authorized by the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association through approval of its members
according to § 4-28-717 and contractual agreement with its administrator or
administrators.
(d) An administrator has no authority to act on behalf of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association beyond the specific
authorization granted in the selection process.
(e) If in a record, the governing principles of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association may limit or eliminate the liability of
an administrator to the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or
its members for money damages for any action taken, or for failure to take
any action, as an administrator except liability for:
(1) The amount of financial benefit improperly received by an
administrator;
(2) An intentional infliction of harm on the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association or its members;
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
(3) An intentional violation of criminal law;
(4) A breach of the duty of loyalty should one exist, unless a
full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that
would otherwise violate the duty of loyalty by an agent be authorized by
approval of the disinterested members under § 4-28-717; or
(5) Improper distributions.

4-28-725. Rights of members and administrators to information.
(a) On reasonable notice, a member or administrator of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association is entitled to an electronic record of
any record maintained by the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association regarding its activities, financial condition, and other
circumstances, to the extent the information exists and is material to the
member’s or administrator’s rights and duties under the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association’s governing principles of this
subchapter, subject to subsection (b) of this section.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association has no
obligation to furnish any record maintained by the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association for record requests which the member or
administrator has access, including through records made available on
distributed ledger technology.
(c) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may impose
reasonable restrictions on access to and use of information to be furnished
under this section, including designating the information confidential and
imposing nondisclosure and safeguarding obligations on the recipient.
(d) A former member or administrator may have access to information to
which the member or administrator was entitled while a member or
administrator if the information pertains to the period during which the
person was a member or administrator, the former member or administrator
seeks the information in good faith, and the former member or administrator
satisfies the requirements of subsections (a)—(c) of this section.
(e) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association has no
obligation to collect and maintain member listings.

4-28-726. Reimbursement — Indemnification — Advancement of expenses —
Insurance.
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
(a) Except as otherwise provided in a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association’s governing principles, members or administrators may
be reimbursed for authorized expenses reasonably incurred on behalf of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
(b)(1) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may
indemnify a member or manager for any debt, obligation, or other liability
incurred during the member or administrator’s activities on behalf of the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
(2) To be eligible for indemnification, an administrator shall
have complied with the duties stated in § 4-28-724.
(3) If in a record, a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association’s governing principles may broaden or limit this right of
indemnification.
(c)(1) If a person is made or threatened to be made a party in a
proceeding based on that person’s conduct of the affairs of a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association, that person is entitled, upon written
request to the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, and
approval, in a record, of the disinterested members under § 4-28-717 of this
subchapter, to receive payment of or reimbursement by the decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association of reasonable expenses, including
attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by that person in advance of the
final disposition of the proceeding.
(2) To be entitled to the advance payments or reimbursements
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the person making the request shall
make a written affirmation that the person has a good faith belief that the
criteria for indemnification in subsection (a) of this section have been
satisfied and that the person will repay the amounts paid or reimbursed if it
is determined that the criteria for reimbursement have not been satisfied.
(d) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may purchase
and maintain insurance on behalf of a member or administrator for liability
asserted against or incurred by the member or administrator in that capacity,
whether or not the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association would
have the power to indemnify or advance expenses to the member or
administrator against the same liability under this subchapter.
(e) These rights of reimbursement, indemnification, and advancement of
expense apply to former members or administrators for activities undertaken
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
on behalf of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association while
they were members or administrators.

4-28-727. Dissolution — Continuation of existence.
(a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may be
dissolved by any of the following methods:
(1) If the governing principles of the association provide a
time or method for dissolution by that method;
(2) If the governing principles of the association do not
provide a method for dissolution, upon approval of the members according to §
4-28-717;
(3) If membership in the organization falls below one hundred
(100) members; or
(4) By court order.
(b) After dissolution, a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association shall continue in existence until its activities have been wound
up and it is terminated under § 4-28-728.

4-28-728. Winding up and termination.
(a) A dissolved decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
shall wind up its business and the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up.
(b) In winding up a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association, the members shall:
(1) Discharge the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association’s debts, obligations, and other liabilities;
(2) Settle and close the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association’s business; and
(3) Marshal and distribute any remaining property:
(i) As required by law other than this subchapter that
requires assets of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association to be
distributed to another entity or person with similar nonprofit purposes;
(ii) According to the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association’s governing principles and in the absence of applicable
governing principles, to the current members of the association in proportion
to their membership interests; or
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
(iii) If neither subdivisions (b)(3)(i) or (b)(3)(ii) of
this section applies, then under the Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-201 et
seq.
(c) In winding up a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association, the members may:
(1) Appoint an administrator or administrators authorized to
wind up the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association according to §
4-28-717;
(2) Preserve the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association operations and property as a going concern for a reasonable time;
(3) Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil,
criminal, or administrative;
(4) Transfer the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association’s property;
(5) Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration;
(6) Receive reasonable compensation for services rendered in
winding up the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association; and
(7) Perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the winding
up.
(d) If the members of decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association do not appoint an administrator or administrators to wind up the
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, the members themselves
shall each owe the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association a duty
of care in the conduct or winding up of the decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association operations to refrain from engaging in grossly
negligent or reckless conduct, willful or intentional misconduct, or a
knowing violation of the law.

4-28-729. Mergers — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Constituent organization" means an organization that is
merged with one or more other organizations and includes the surviving
organization;
(2) "Disappearing organization" means a constituent organization
that is not the surviving organization;
(3)(A) "Organization" means a decentralized unincorporated
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
nonprofit association, an unincorporated nonprofit association, a general
partnership, including a limited liability partnership, a limited
partnership, including a limited liability limited partnership, limited
liability company, business, or statutory trust, a corporation, or any other
legal or commercial entity having a statute governing its formation and
operation.
(B) "Organization" includes a domestic or foreign
organization regardless of whether the organization is a for profit
organization; and
(4) "Surviving organization" means an organization into which
one (1) or more other organizations are merged.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may merge
with any organization that is authorized by law to effect a merger with a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
(c) A merger involving a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association is subject to the following requirements:
(1) Each of the constituent organizations complies with its
governing law;
(2)(A) Each party to the merger shall approve a plan of merger
according to its governing principles.
(B) The plan shall be in a record.
(C) The plan shall include the following provisions:
(i) The name and form of each organization that is a
party to the merger;
(ii) The name and form of the surviving organization
and, if the surviving organization is to be created by the merger, a
statement to that effect;
(iii) The terms and conditions of the merger,
including the manner and basis for converting the interests in each
constituent organization into any combination of money, interests in the
surviving organization, and other consideration;
(iv) If the surviving organization is to be created
by the merger, the surviving organization’s organizational documents that are
proposed to be in a record; and
(v) If the surviving organization is not to be
created by the merger, any amendments to be made by the merger to the
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
surviving organization’s organizational documents that are, or are proposed
to be, in a record;
(3)(A) The plan of merger shall be approved by the members of
each decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association that is a constituent
organization in the merger.
(B) If a member of a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association that is a party to a merger has personal liability with
respect to an obligation of a constituent or a surviving organization, the
consent in a record of that member to the plan of merger shall also be
obtained;
(4) Subject to the contractual rights of third parties, after a
plan of merger is approved and at any time before the merger is effective, a
constituent organization may amend the plan or abandon the merger as provided
in the plan, or except as otherwise prohibited in the plan, with the same
consent as was required to approve the plan; and
(5) Following approval of the plan, a merger under this section
is effective:
(A) If a constituent organization is required to give
notice to or obtain the approval of a governmental agency or officer in order
to be a party to a merger, the notice has been given and the approval has
been obtained; and
(B) If the surviving organization is a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association, as specified in the plan of merger and
upon compliance by any constituent organization that is not a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association with any requirements of the
organization's governing statute, including any required filings in the
office of the Secretary of State; or
(C) If the surviving organization is not a decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association, as provided by the statute governing
the surviving organization.
(d) When a merger becomes effective:
(1) The surviving organization continues or comes into
existence;
(2) Each constituent organization that merges into the surviving
organization ceases to exist as a separate entity;
(3) All property owned by each constituent organization that
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
ceases to exist vests in the surviving organization;
(4) All debts, obligations, or other liabilities of each
constituent organization that ceases to exist continue as debts, obligations,
or other liabilities of the surviving organization;
(5) An action or proceeding pending by or against any
constituent organization that ceases to exist may be continued as if the
merger had not occurred;
(6) Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights,
privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each constituent organization
that ceases to exist vest in the surviving organization;
(7) Except as otherwise provided in the plan of merger, the
terms and conditions of the plan of merger take effect;
(8) The merger does not affect the personal liability, if any,
of a member, administrator, or manager of a constituent association for a
debt, liability, or obligation of the association incurred before the merger
is effective; and
(9)(A) A surviving organization that is a foreign organization
consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any debt,
obligation, or other liability owed by a constituent organization, if before
the merger the constituent organization was subject to suit in this state on
the debt, obligation, or other liability.
(B) A surviving organization that is a foreign
organization and not authorized to transact business in this state shall
appoint the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process for the
purposes of enforcing a debt, obligation, or other liability under
subdivision (d)(9)(A) of this section.
(e) Property held for a charitable purpose under the law of this state
by a domestic or foreign organization immediately before a merger under this
section becomes effective may not, as a result of the merger, be diverted
from the objects for which it was donated, granted, or devised, unless, to
the extent required under the law of this state concerning cy pres or other
law dealing with nondiversion of charitable assets, the organization shall
obtain an appropriate order of the Pulaski County Circuit Court specifying
the disposition of the property.
(f)(1) A bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will
or other instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance that is made to
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
a disappearing organization and that takes effect or remains payable after
the merger inures to the benefit of the surviving organization.
(2) A trust obligation that would govern property if transferred
to the disappearing entity applies to property that is instead transferred to
the surviving organization under this section.

4-28-730. Conversions — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Conversion" means a transaction authorized by this section
under which an entity of one (1) type is converted into an entity of another
type;
(2) "Converted entity" means the entity that results from a
conversion; and
(3) "Converting entity" means the entity that becomes the
converted entity through a conversion.
(b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may convert
to any form of entity that is authorized by law to affect a conversion from a
decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
(c) A conversion involving a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association is subject to the following requirements:
(1) Each of the constituent converting organizations complies
with its governing principles;
(2)(A) The decentralized unincorporated organization, as a
converting entity, shall approve a plan of conversion according to its
governing principles.
(B) The plan shall be in a record and include the
following provisions:
(i) The name of the converting decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association;
(ii) The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type
of entity of the converted entity;
(iii) The manner of converting the interest in the
converting decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association into interests,
securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests
or securities, or any combination of the requirements under this section;
(iv) If the converted entity requires a record that
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
is filed publicly to form, organize, incorporate, or otherwise create a
converted entity, the converted entity’s organizational documents that are
proposed to be in a record;
(v) If the converted entity does not require a
record that is filed publicly to form, organize, incorporate, or otherwise
create a converted entity, a record of the converted entities' governing
principles to the extent they exist;
(vi) The other terms and conditions of the
conversion; and
(vii) Any other provision required by the law of
this state or the governing principles of the converting decentralized
unincorporated nonprofit association;
(3)(A) The plan of conversion shall be approved by the members
of the converting decentralized unincorporated according to its governing
principles.
(B) If a member of decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
association that is a party to a conversion shall have personal liability
with respect to an obligation of a converted entity or converting entity, the
consent in a record of that member to the plan of conversion shall also be
obtained;
(4) Subject to the contractual rights of third parties, after a
plan of conversion is approved and at any time before the conversion is
effective, a converting entity may amend the plan or abandon the conversion
as provided in the plan, or except as otherwise prohibited in the plan, with
the same consent as was required to approve the plan; and
(5) Following approval of the plan, a conversion under this
section is effective:
(A) If a converted entity is required to give notice to or
obtain the approval of a governmental agency or officer in order to form an
entity, the notice has been given and the approval has been obtained; and
(B) If a converted entity is not required to give notice
or obtain the approval of a governmental agency or officer in order to form
an entity, as provided by the statute governing the converted entity.
(d) A conversion becomes effective when the converted entity comes
into existence.
(e) When a conversion becomes effective:
03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1533
(1) The converted entity is:
(A) Organized under and subject to the laws of the
converted entity; and
(B) The same entity without interruption as the converting
entity;
(2) All property of the converting entity continues to be vested
in the converted entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;
(3) All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the
converting entity continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of
the converted entity; and
(4) The name of the converted entity may be substituted for the
name of the converting entity in any pending action or proceeding.
(f) A conversion does not require the entity to wind up its affairs
and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the entity.

4-28-731. Uniformity of application and construction.
In applying and construing this subchapter, consideration shall be
given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it.

4-28-732. Effective date.
This subchapter takes effect on January 1, 2026.

/s/Gramlich












03-04-2025 10:14:58 ANS273